test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv8_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    egg+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: egg
    egg+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: egg
    egg+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: egg
    egg+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: eggjar
    egg+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: eggjar
    egg+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: eggjum
    egg+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: eggja
    egg+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: eggin
    egg+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: eggina
    egg+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: eggini
    egg+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: eggjarinnar
    egg+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: eggjarnar
    egg+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: eggjunum
    egg+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: eggjanna
